New Jersey, session 221, S3579.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Suicide prevention barrier means a physical barrier on a bridge or overpass used to reduce access to, or deter individuals from attempting suicide by jumping from, the elevated structure. b.    Within one year of enactment, the Department of Transportation shall conduct and complete a study to identify any bridge or overpass carrying a State road or highway that is under the jurisdiction of the department, is not a local or county bridge or overpass, and poses a significant suicide threat.  To determine whether a bridge or overpass poses a significant suicide threat, the department shall consider: (1) the height of the bridge or overpass; (2) the location of the bridge or overpass; (3) potential transportation hazards; and (4) information on the occurrence of suicide at the bridge or overpass. The department shall consider, for each bridge or overpass included in the study, the feasibility of adding a suicide prevention barrier to each, including an assessment of the structural impact of constructing a suicide prevention barrier on each. c.     The Department of Transportation shall erect suicide prevention barriers on every bridge or overpass carrying a State road or highway that is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation, is not a local or county bridge or overpass, is determined to pose a significant suicide threat, based on the results of the study required to be conducted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, and is feasible.  The department shall determine the type of suicide prevention barrier for each bridge or overpass. d.    In the event that it is infeasible to erect a suicide prevention barrier on a bridge or overpass determined by the department to pose a significant suicide threat, the department shall erect secondary suicide prevention methods, including, but not limited to: surveillance systems, emergency phones connected to crisis hotlines, increased patrols, and informational signs to direct individuals to support services. 2.    a.  As used in this section: Suicide prevention barrier means a physical barrier on a bridge or overpass used to reduce access to, or deter individuals from attempting suicide by jumping from, the elevated structure. b.    Within one year of enactment, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall conduct and complete a study to identify any bridge or overpass carrying a State road or highway that is under the jurisdiction of the authority, is not a local or county bridge or overpass, and poses a significant suicide threat.  To determine whether a bridge or overpass poses a significant suicide threat, the authority shall consider: (1) the height of the bridge or overpass; (2) the location of the bridge or overpass; (3) potential transportation hazards; and (4) information on the occurrence of suicide at the bridge or overpass. The authority shall consider, for each bridge or overpass included in the study, the feasibility of adding a suicide prevention barrier to each, including an assessment of the structural impact of constructing a suicide prevention barrier on each. c.     The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall erect suicide prevention barriers on every bridge or overpass that is under the jurisdiction of the authority, is not a local or county bridge or overpass, is determined to pose a significant suicide threat, based on the results of the study required to be conducted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, and is feasible.  The authority shall determine the type of suicide prevention barrier for each bridge or overpass. d.    In the event that it is infeasible to erect a suicide prevention barrier on a bridge or overpass determined by the authority to pose a significant suicide threat, the authority shall erect secondary suicide prevention methods, including, but not limited to: surveillance systems, emergency phones connected to crisis hotlines, increased patrols, and informational signs to direct individuals to support services. 3.    a.  As used in this section: Suicide prevention barrier means a physical barrier on a bridge or overpass used to reduce access to, or deter individuals from attempting suicide by jumping from, the elevated structure. b.    Within one year of enactment, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall conduct and complete a study to identify any bridge or overpass carrying a State road or highway that is under the jurisdiction of the authority, is not a local or county bridge or overpass, and poses a significant suicide threat.  To determine whether a bridge or overpass poses a significant suicide threat, the authority shall consider: (1) the height of the bridge or overpass; (2) the location of the bridge or overpass; (3) potential transportation hazards; and (4) information on the occurrence of suicide at the bridge or overpass. The authority shall consider, for each bridge or overpass included in the study, the feasibility of adding a suicide prevention barrier to each, including an assessment of the structural impact of constructing a suicide prevention barrier on each. c.     The South Jersey Transportation Authority shall erect suicide prevention barriers on every bridge or overpass that is under the jurisdiction of the authority, is not a local or county bridge or overpass, is determined to pose a significant suicide threat, based on the results of the study required to be conducted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, and is feasible.  The authority shall determine the type of suicide prevention barrier for each bridge or overpass. d.    In the event that it is infeasible to erect a suicide prevention barrier on a bridge or overpass determined by the authority to pose a significant suicide threat, the authority shall erect secondary suicide prevention methods, including, but not limited to: surveillance systems, emergency phones connected to crisis hotlines, increased patrols, and informational signs to direct individuals to support services. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.